Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2421
License; reciprocity; military spouse; temporary license.

The department may issue a license to any person who holds a current nursing home administrator license from another jurisdiction and is at least nineteen years old. An applicant for a license who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1988, LB 693, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 733, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1989, § 71-2041.04;

Laws 1991, LB 455, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 85;

Laws 1999, LB 411, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 57;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6056;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 836;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 81.